Utah statutes.
52-4-205.   Purposes of closed meetings.

(1)  A closed meeting described under Section 52-4-204 may only be held for:

(a)  discussion of the character, professional competence, or physical or mental health of an individual;

(b)  strategy sessions to discuss collective bargaining;

(c)  strategy sessions to discuss pending or reasonably imminent litigation;

(d)  strategy sessions to discuss the purchase, exchange, or lease of real property, including any form of a water right or water shares, if public discussion of the transaction would:

(i)  disclose the appraisal or estimated value of the property under consideration; or

(ii)  prevent the public body from completing the transaction on the best possible terms;

(e)  strategy sessions to discuss the sale of real property, including any form of a water right or water shares, if:

(i)  public discussion of the transaction would:

(A)  disclose the appraisal or estimated value of the property under consideration; or

(B)  prevent the public body from completing the transaction on the best possible terms;

(ii)  the public body previously gave public notice that the property would be offered for sale; and

(iii)  the terms of the sale are publicly disclosed before the public body approves the sale;

(f)  discussion regarding deployment of security personnel, devices, or systems;

(g)  investigative proceedings regarding allegations of criminal misconduct;

(h)  as relates to the Independent Legislative Ethics Commission, conducting business relating to the receipt or review of ethics complaints;

(i)  as relates to an ethics committee of the Legislature, a purpose permitted under Subsection 52-4-204(1)(a)(iii)(B);

(j)  as relates to a county legislative body, discussing commercial information as defined in Section 59-1-404; or

(k)  a purpose for which a meeting is required to be closed under Subsection (2).

(2)  The following meetings shall be closed:

(a)  a meeting of the Health and Human Services Interim Committee to review a fatality review report described in Subsection 62A-16-301(1)(a), and the responses to the report described in Subsections 62A-16-301(2) and (4); and

(b)  a meeting of the Child Welfare Legislative Oversight Panel to:

(i)  review a fatality review report described in Subsection 62A-16-301(1)(a), and the responses to the report described in Subsections 62A-16-301(2) and (4); or

(ii)  review and discuss an individual case, as described in Subsection 62A-4a-207(5).

(3)  A public body may not interview a person applying to fill an elected position in a closed meeting.

